California statutes. Education Code
(c) Employers shall be liable to the plan for employee and employer contributions and interest with respect to the Defined Benefit Program from the date of hire, or March 1, 1995, whichever is later, in addition to system administrative and audit costs, if an audit or a member’s complaint reveals noncompliance. However, no employer shall be liable for employee contributions for service performed prior to January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22456.

At any time upon the request of the system, the employer shall furnish a statement of the amount of contributions deducted from the compensation of any member, the service performed and the compensation earned by the member since the end of the period covered by the last report of the employer. The system may use the information shown in the statement in determining contributions to be paid by or to the member or to a beneficiary, or use it in determining the member’s status upon retirement, even though the member’s and employer’s contributions will not be received by the board until after the payment or determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22457.

(a) Each county superintendent shall give immediate notice in writing to the board of the employment, death, resignation, or discharge of any person employed by the county or by a school district or community college district in the county to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) Every other employing agency shall give similar notice with respect to each person it employs to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22458.

Each employer shall provide the system with information regarding the compensation to be paid to employees subject to the Defined Benefit Program in that school year. The information shall be submitted annually as determined by the board and may include, but shall not be limited to, employment contracts, salary schedules, and local board minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22458.5.

Upon request from the system, each employer shall provide the system with information regarding the certification qualifications, minimum standards, or provisions of an approved charter for the operation of a charter school required to perform creditable service pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22119.5, in a position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 8.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22459.

(a) The county superintendent or other employing agency shall withhold the salary of any member who fails to file information required by the board in the administration of the Defined Benefit Program, or to pay amounts due from the members to the fund with respect to the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) The salary shall be withheld by the county superintendent or employing agency upon his or her own knowledge, if any, of the failure or upon notice from the board of the failure of the member to file or pay.

(c) The salary shall be withheld and not released until notice is given by the board to the county superintendent or employing agency, or until the county superintendent or agency knows otherwise, that the information has been filed or the payment has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22460.

(a) If a member terminates employment with less than five years of credited service, the employer shall notify the member of the following:

(1) That unless the member is eligible, or becomes eligible in the future, for concurrent retirement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24201, the member is eligible only for a refund of accumulated retirement contributions under the Defined Benefit Program and the return of the member’s accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance.

(2) The current rate of interest that shall be earned on accumulated retirement contributions that are not refunded and the current minimum interest rate that shall be applied to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(3) Actions that may be taken by the board if accumulated retirement contributions are not refunded under the Defined Benefit Program and the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account balance is not returned.

(b) Employers shall transmit to a member who terminates employment with less than five years of credited service the information specified in subdivision (a) as part of the usual separation documents.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22461.

(a) Upon retaining the services of a retired member under Section 24114, 24116, 24214, 24214.5, or 24215, the school district, community college district, county superintendent of schools, California State University, or other employing agency shall do both of the following regardless of whether the retired member performs the services as an employee of the employer, an employee of a third party, or an independent contractor:

(1) Advise the retired member of the earnings limitation or employment restriction set forth in Sections 22714, 24114, 24116, 24214, 24214.5, and 24215.

(2) Maintain accurate records of the retired member’s earnings and report those
 earnings monthly to the system and the retired member regardless of the method of payment or the fund from which the payments were made.

(b) This section shall not be construed to make any school district, community college district, county superintendent of schools, the California State University, or other employing agency liable for any amount paid to the retired member in excess of the earnings limitation under any circumstance, including the failure to inform the retired member that continuation of service would exceed the limitations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 7.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Membership [22500. - 22516.]

22500.

All persons who were members of the California State Teachers’ Retirement System on June 30, 1996, are members of the Defined Benefit Program under the plan, in accordance with Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22501.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a full-time basis shall become a member as of the first day of employment, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601.

(b) Creditable service in more than one position shall not be aggregated for the purpose of determining mandatory membership under this section.

(c) This section shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 7.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.

(a) (1) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a part-time basis for 50 percent or more of the time the employer requires for the full-time position shall become a member as of the first day of employment, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601.

(2) Creditable service in more than one position shall not be aggregated for the purpose of determining mandatory membership under this subdivision.

(b) Any
 person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service shall become a member as of the first day of employment, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601 or subdivision (b) of Section 22601.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a substitute basis shall become a member as of the first day of the pay period following the pay period in which the person
 performs the person’s 100th complete day of creditable service during a school year for one school district or county office of education, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601.

(b) This section does not apply to creditable service performed for an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(c) This section is deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 3.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22504.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a part-time hourly basis shall become a member as of the first day of the pay period following the pay period in which the person performs 60 or more hours of creditable service for one school district or county office of education, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601.

(b) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform
 creditable service on a part-time daily basis shall become a member as of the first day of the pay period following the pay period in which the person performs 10 or more days of creditable service for one school district or county office of education, unless excluded from membership pursuant to Section 22601.

(c) This section does not apply to creditable service performed for an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 4.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.

(a) A member who becomes employed by the same or a different school district or community college district, or a county superintendent, or who becomes employed by the state in a position described in subdivision (b), to perform service that requires membership in a different public retirement system, and who is not excluded from membership in that public retirement system, may elect to have that service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program of this plan and excluded from coverage by the other public retirement system. If that election is made, the service performed for the employer in that position as of the date of hire shall be considered creditable service for purposes of this part.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to a member who becomes employed by the state only if the member is also one of the following:

(1) Represented by a state bargaining unit that represents educational consultants, professional educators, or librarians employed by the state.

(2) Excluded from the definition of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code, but performing, supervising, or managing work similar to work performed by employees described in paragraph (1).

(3) In a position not covered by civil service and in the executive branch of government, but performing, supervising, or managing work similar to work performed by employees described in paragraph (1).

(c) A member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who is subsequently employed to perform creditable service requiring coverage by the Defined Benefit Program of this plan may elect to have that subsequent service subject to coverage by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and excluded from coverage by the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Section 20309 of the Government Code.

(d) An election made by a member pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 8.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.5.

(a) Any person who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan employed by a community college district who subsequently is employed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to perform duties that are subject to membership in a different public retirement system may elect to have that service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program of this plan and excluded from coverage by the other public retirement system. Only a person who has achieved plan vesting is eligible to elect to continue as a member of the program.

(b) A member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who is employed by the Board of Governors of
 the California Community Colleges who subsequently is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, may elect to have that service subject to coverage by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and excluded from coverage under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Section 20309 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall apply to changes in employment effective on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 12.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.6.

(a) Any person who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who subsequently became employed and continues to be employed by the state to perform service that requires membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System and who meets the requirements of subdivision (b) may elect to have that state service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program and excluded from coverage by the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(b) (1) Only a person who has achieved program vesting shall be eligible to make the election under this section.

(2) A person is eligible to make the election if he or she left employment with a school district, county superintendent of schools, or community college district and began employment with the state within 30 days without any intervening employment and that change in employment occurred on or after July 1, 1991, and prior to the effective date of this section.

(3) A person is eligible to make the election if, at the time of the election, he or she is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System subject to Second Tier benefits and is one of the following:

(A) Represented by a State Bargaining Unit that has agreed by a memorandum of understanding to become subject to Section 20309.5 of the Government Code.

(B) Excluded from the definition of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code, but performing, supervising, or managing work similar to work performed by employees described in subparagraph (A).

(C) In a position not covered by civil service and in the executive branch of government, but performing, supervising, or managing work similar to work performed by employees described in subparagraph (A).

(c) The election under this section shall be made in writing to each system within 90 days after the effective date of this section or within 60 days after the eligible member is notified by the system of his or her right to make the election, whichever is later. The member’s election shall be effective on the day following the date on which the election is received by the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(d) If the election is made, the state service performed from and after the date of the election shall be considered creditable service for purposes of this part and the provisions of Section 22801.5 shall be applicable with respect to service performed prior to that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.7.

(a) This section shall apply to service deemed creditable service pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22119.6 and a person who performs that service.

(b) (1) A member, including a member who retires on or before December 31, 2015, may elect to have all of that service subject to coverage by a different public retirement system and excluded from coverage by the Defined Benefit Program, if the member is not excluded from coverage by that public retirement system.

(2) If an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(A) All service that was subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program shall be subject to coverage by the other public retirement system, if the member is not excluded from coverage by that public retirement system.

(B) Any member contributions and credited interest, as determined by the system, and employer contributions, less any amounts previously paid to the person, shall be returned to the employer for that service, with the system recovering from the person any amounts that were paid to the person and not recovered from withheld member contributions, credited interest, or employer contributions.

(C) Any amounts not recovered pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be paid in full by the member before his or her
 service can be subject to coverage by the other public retirement system.

(3) If an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, the
 following shall apply:

(A) A member not subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 in the Defined Benefit Program shall not be subject to that act in the other public retirement system.

(B) A member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 in the Defined Benefit Program shall be subject to that act in the other public retirement system.

(4) If an election is not made pursuant to this subdivision, all service performed shall continue to be subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program until the member becomes employed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22119.6.

(c) (1) A person who had service removed from the system and reported to a different public retirement system, as directed by the system, including a person who is receiving a benefit on or before December 31, 2015, may elect to have all of that service and subsequent service in the same position subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program and excluded from coverage by the other public retirement system.

(2) If an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(A) All of that service and subsequent service in the same position that was subject to coverage by the other public retirement system shall be subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program and reported to the system pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with
 Section 23000).

(B) Any employee and employer contributions for that service and subsequent service in the same position shall be remitted to the system pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 23000).

(3) If an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, the following shall apply:

(A) A person not subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 in the other public retirement system shall not be subject to that act in the Defined Benefit Program.

(B) A person subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 in the other public retirement system shall be subject to that act in the Defined Benefit
 Program.

(4) If an election is not made pursuant to this subdivision, all service performed will continue to be subject to coverage by the other public retirement system.

(d) The election shall be made in writing and filed with the office of the system on a form prescribed by the system on or before June 30, 2016, and a copy of the election shall be filed with the other public retirement system.

(e) Only a person who has performed service creditable under subdivision (a) of Section 22119.6 can make an election under this section.

(f) An election made pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable.

(g) The board shall be under no obligation to identify, locate, or notify a person who has performed service creditable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22119.6 and is eligible to make an election pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 9.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22509.

(a) Within 10 working days of the date of hire of an employee who has the right to make an election pursuant to Section 22508 or 22508.5, the employer shall inform the employee of the right to make an election and shall make available to the employee written information provided by each retirement system concerning the benefits provided under that retirement system to assist the employee in making an election.

(b) Any election made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22508 or subdivision (a) of Section 22508.5 shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system within 60 calendar days from the date of hire in the position requiring membership in the
 other public retirement system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature.
 The employer shall retain a copy of the employee’s signed election form and submit the original signed election form to the system’s headquarters office.

(c) Any election made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 22508 or subdivision (b) of Section 22508.5 shall be filed with the office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(d) Any election made pursuant to Section 22508 or Section 22508.5 shall become effective as of the first day of employment in the position that qualified the employee to make an election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 8.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22515.

(a) Persons excluded from membership pursuant to Sections 22601.5, 22602, and 22604 may elect membership in the Defined Benefit Program at any time while employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under that program.

(b) The election shall be in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by this system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s
 signature and prior to submission of contributions. Membership in the Defined Benefit Program shall become effective no earlier than the first day of the pay period in which the election is made. The election is irrevocable and shall remain in effect until the member terminates employment and receives a refund of accumulated retirement contributions.

(c) The amendments to this section enacted during the 1995–96 Regular Session shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 10.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22516.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or applied to exclude from membership in the Defined Benefit Program any person employed to perform creditable service at a level that requires mandatory membership in the program for which he or she has the right to elect membership in the program or another retirement system and who elects membership in the other retirement system, or who is employed to perform creditable service at a level that does not require mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) Service performed after becoming a member of another retirement system shall not be credited to the member under this part, nor
 shall contributions or benefits under this part be based upon that service or the compensation received by the member during that period of service, except as provided in the definition of “final compensation” contained in Section 22134 or 22134.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 15.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Exclusions from Membership [22601. - 22604.]

22601.

Persons serving as exchange teachers or sojourn teachers from outside of this state are excluded from membership in the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22601.5.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a part-time basis for less than 50 percent of the time the employer requires for the full-time position is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service on a temporary basis pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5 is excluded from mandatory membership in the
 Defined Benefit Program.

(c) Creditable service performed by a person who is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to this section shall be subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Section 26400 if the employer provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 5.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22602.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a substitute basis and performs less than 100 complete days of creditable service
 during a school year for one school district or county office of education is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program. This subdivision shall only apply to persons who are employed to perform creditable service by an employer that does not provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(b) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a substitute basis is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program, and creditable service performed shall be subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Section 26400 if employed by an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing
 with Section 26000).

(c) The amendments to this section enacted during the 1995–96 Regular Session shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 6.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22604.

(a) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a part-time hourly basis and who performs less than 60 hours of creditable service in a pay period
 for one school district or county office of education is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program. This subdivision shall only apply to persons who are employed to perform creditable service by an employer that does not provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(b) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a part-time daily basis and who performs less than 10 days of creditable service in a pay period for one school district or county office of education is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program. This subdivision shall only apply to persons who are employed to perform creditable service
 by an employer that does not provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(c) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed by a school district or county office of education to perform creditable service on a
 part-time hourly or part-time daily basis is excluded from mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program, and any creditable service performed shall be subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Section 26400 if employed by an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 7.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Community Property [22650. - 22666.]

22650.

(a) This chapter establishes the power of a court in a dissolution of marriage or legal separation action with respect to community property rights in accounts with the plan under this part and establishes and defines the rights of nonmember spouses and nonmember registered domestic partners in the plan under this part.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the termination, dissolution, or nullity of a registered domestic partnership, or the legal separation of partners in a
 registered domestic partnership, as provided in Section 299 of the Family Code, shall be treated in the same manner as a dissolution of marriage or legal separation of a member and his or her spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.

(a) For purposes of this chapter and Section 23300, “nonmember spouse” means a member’s spouse or former spouse, and also includes a member’s registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner, who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the service credit, accumulated retirement contributions, accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or benefits of the member under this part.

(b) For purposes of this chapter and Section 23300,
 a member’s registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the service credit, accumulated retirement contributions, accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or benefits of the member under this part shall be treated in the same manner as a nonmember spouse.

(c) A nonmember spouse shall not be considered a member based upon his or her receipt of any of the following being awarded to the nonmember spouse as a result of legal separation or dissolution of marriage:

(1) A separate account of service credit and accumulated retirement contributions, a retirement allowance, or an interest in the member’s retirement allowance under the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) A separate account based on the member’s Defined Benefit
 Supplement account balance, a retirement benefit, or an interest in the member’s retirement benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22652.

(a) Upon the legal separation or dissolution of marriage of a member, other than a retired member, the court shall include in the judgment or a court order the date on which the parties separated.

(b) The court may order in the judgment
 or court order that the member’s accumulated retirement contributions and service credit under the Defined Benefit Program, or the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or both, under this part that are attributable to periods of service during the marriage be divided into two separate and distinct accounts in the name of the member and the nonmember spouse, respectively. Any service credit and accumulated retirement contributions under the Defined Benefit Program and any accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance under this part that are not explicitly awarded by the judgment or court order shall be deemed the exclusive property of the member under the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, as applicable.

(c) The determination of the court of community property rights pursuant to this section shall be consistent with this chapter and shall address the rights of the nonmember spouse under
 this part, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The right to a retirement allowance under the Defined Benefit Program and, if applicable, a retirement benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(2) The right to a refund of accumulated retirement contributions under the Defined Benefit Program and the return of the accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance that were awarded to the nonmember spouse.

(3) The right to redeposit all or a portion of accumulated retirement contributions previously refunded to the member which the member is eligible to redeposit pursuant to Sections 23200 to 23203, inclusive, and shall specify the shares of the redeposit amount awarded to the member and the nonmember spouse.

(4) The right to
 purchase additional service credit that the member is eligible to purchase pursuant to Sections 22800 to 22810, inclusive, and shall specify the shares of the additional service credit awarded to the member and the nonmember spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22653.

(a) The nonmember spouse who is awarded a separate account under this part pursuant to Section 22652 is not a member of the Defined Benefit Program based on that award. The nonmember spouse is entitled only to rights and benefits based on that award explicitly established by this chapter.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit any right arising from the account of a nonmember spouse under this part that exists because the nonmember spouse is or was employed to perform
 creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22655.

(a) Upon the legal separation or dissolution of marriage of a retired member, the court may include in the judgment or court order a determination of the community property rights of the parties in the retired member’s retirement allowance and, if applicable, retirement benefit under this part consistent with this section. Upon election under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2610 of the Family Code, the court order awarding the nonmember spouse a community property share in the retirement allowance or retirement benefit, or both, of a retired member shall be consistent with this section.

(b) If the court does not
 award the entire retirement allowance or retirement benefit under this part to the retired member and the retired member is receiving a retirement allowance that has not been modified pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1, a single life annuity pursuant to Section 25011 or 25018, or a member only annuity described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Sections 25011.1 and 25018.1, the court shall require only that the system pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or her community property share of the retired member’s retirement allowance or retirement benefit, or both, under this part.

(c) If the court does not award the entire retirement allowance or retirement benefit under this part to the retired member and the retired member is receiving an allowance that has been actuarially modified pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1, or a
 joint and survivor annuity pursuant to Section 25011, 25011.1, 25018, or 25018.1, the court shall order only one of the following:

(1) The retired member shall maintain the retirement allowance or joint and survivor annuity, or both, under this part without change.

(2) The retired member shall cancel the option that modified the retirement allowance under this part pursuant to Section 24322 and elect a new joint and survivor option or designate a new beneficiary or both, and the system shall pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or her community property share of the retirement allowance payable to the retired member, the option beneficiary, or both.

(3) The retired member shall cancel the joint and
 survivor annuity under which the retirement benefit is being paid pursuant to Section 24324, and elect a new joint and survivor annuity or designate a new annuity beneficiary or both, based on the actuarial equivalent of the member’s canceled annuity, and the system shall pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or her community property share of the retirement benefit payable to the retired member, the annuity beneficiary, or both.

(4) The retired member shall take the action specified in both paragraphs (2) and (3).

(5) The retired member shall cancel the option that modified the retirement allowance under this part pursuant to Section 24322 and elect an unmodified retirement allowance and the system shall pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or
 her
 community property share of the retired member’s retirement allowance under this part.

(6) The retired member shall cancel, pursuant to Section 24324, the joint and survivor annuity under which the retirement benefit is being paid, and elect a single life annuity, and the system shall pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or her community property share of the retirement benefit payable to the retired member.

(7) The retired member shall take the action specified in both paragraphs (5) and (6).

(d) If the option beneficiary or annuity beneficiary or both under this part, other than the nonmember spouse, predeceases the retired member, the court shall order the retired member to designate a new
 option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, or a new annuity beneficiary pursuant to Section 24324 and shall order the system to pay the nonmember spouse, by separate warrant, his or her share of the community property interest in the retirement allowance or retirement benefit payable to the retired member or the new option beneficiary or annuity beneficiary or each of them.

(e) The right of the nonmember spouse to receive his or her community property share of the retired member’s retirement allowance or retirement benefit or both under this section shall terminate upon the death of the nonmember spouse. However, the nonmember spouse may designate a beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Program and a payee under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to receive his or her community property share of the retired member’s accumulated
 retirement contributions and accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance under this part in the event that there are remaining accumulated retirement contributions and a balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to be paid upon the death of the nonmember spouse.
